Utah statutes.
23-30-103.   Mule Deer Protection Account -- Contents -- Use of Funds.

(1)  There is created a restricted account within the General Fund known as the "Mule Deer Protection Restricted Account."

(a)  The restricted account shall consist of:

(i)  appropriations made by the Legislature; and

(ii)  grants or donations from:

(A)  the federal government;

(B)  a state agency;

(C)  a local government; or

(D)  a person.

(b)  The division shall administer the restricted account.

(2)  Subject to appropriation, the division may expend money in the restricted account on:

(a)  a program established by rule under Subsection 23-30-104(1);

(b)  a contract for targeted predator control described in Subsection 23-30-104(3)(a);

(c)  predator control education and training related to mule deer protection described in Subsection 23-30-104(3)(b); and

(d)  administration costs incurred to carry out the requirements of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 143, 2012 General Session

